District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-2201.05

Fleeing from scene of accident; driving under the influence of liquor or drugs.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1925, 43 Stat. 1124, ch. 443, § 10
Feb. 27, 1931, 46 Stat. 1427, ch. 317, § 4
Dec. 15, 1944, 58 Stat. 805, ch. 588
Aug. 16, 1954, 68 Stat. 732, ch. 741, §§ 7, 8
Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 604(b)(1), 28 DCR 3081
Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, §§ 5, 7, 29 DCR 3138
Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-174, §§ 10, 11, 29 DCR 5753
May 5, 1992, D.C. Law 9-96, § 4(c), 38 DCR 7274
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 32, 40 DCR 6311
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 3, 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-212, § 2(a), 46 DCR 5
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-238, § 2(a), 48 DCR 602
Oct. 16, 2006, 120 Stat. 2042, Pub. L. 109-356, § 307
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-195, § 8, 53 DCR 8675
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 228(a), 53 DCR 8610
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 141, 56 DCR 1117
Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 228, 56 DCR 7413
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9002, 58 DCR 6226
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 102(e), 59 DCR 12957

History

Alcoholic beverage control, operation of trains, streetcars, and other vehicles by intoxicated persons, see § 25-1009.
Compensation of victims of violent crime, convicted persons, assessments imposed in addition to punishment, see § 4-516.
Compensation of victims of violent crime, “crime of violence,” “crime,” and “victim” defined, see § 4-501.
Criminal procedure, warrantless arrests, see § 23-581.
District of Columbia administration, drug and alcohol testing, implied consent of employees operating vehicles in the scope of employment, see § 1-620.24.
Traffic adjudication, violations prosecuted as criminal offenses, see § 50-2302.02.

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 1-620.24, § 4-501, § 4-516, § 7-2502.03, § 16-801, § 23-581, § 50-2201.27, and § 50-2302.02.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 40-716.
1973 Ed., § 40-609.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-238, in subsec. (b), rewrote pars. (1) and (2), added the last sentence to par. (4), and added par. (6).
Pub. L. 109-356 rewrote subsec. (b)(3).
D.C. Law 16-195 rewrote subsec. (b)(1): and, in subsec. (b)(2), substituted “person” for “individual”.
D.C. Law 16-306, in subsec. (d), substituted “who is convicted or adjudicated a juvenile delinquent as a result of the commission in the District” for “who is convicted in the District”.
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in subsec. (b).
D.C. Law 18-88 rewrote subsecs. (b)(1)(B), (C), (D), and (b)(2).
D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (b)(3), deleted “, shall be used by the District of Columbia exclusively for the enforcement and prosecution of the District traffic alcohol laws, and shall remain available until expended” following “District of Columbia”.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Underage Drinking Temporary Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-12, September 11, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 6834).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of Driving Under the Influence Repeat Offenders Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-198, October 21, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 8988).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Driving Under the Influence Repeat Offenders Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-382, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6697).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of expiration date of section, see § 4 of the Driving Under the Influence Repeat Offenders Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-382, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6697).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2 and 4 of the Driving Under the Influence Repeat Offenders Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-437, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8737).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 228(a) of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(e)(1) of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-469, July 31, 2006, 53 DCR 6764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 228(a) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 8 of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-518, October 27, 2006, 53 DCR 9104).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 8(a) of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-6, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1452).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 228(a) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 228(a) of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 228 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 228 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 102(e) of Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-429, July 30, 2012, 59 DCR 9387).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 102(e) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12774).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 102(e) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 102(e) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).

Emergency Legislation

Short title: Section 9001 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle A of title IX of the act may be cited as “Fiscal Year 2012 Transfer of Special Purpose Funds Act of 2011”.

Short Title

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 12-212

Section 8(b) of D.C. Law 12-212 providing that the act shall expire on September 30, 2000, was repealed by section 4 of D.C. Law 13-238.

“This act”, referred to at the end of subsection (b)(4), means the District of Columbia Traffic Act, 1925.

References in Text

Implementation of authority under Law 4-145: See Mayor’s Order 83-234, September 30, 1983.

Mayor's Orders

Editor's Notes

Mayor authorized to issue rules: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-2205.02.

For present law, see subchapter III-A of this chapter generally, § 50-2206.01 et seq.; and §§ 50-2206.11, 50-2206.12, 50-2206.14, and 50-2206.16 specifically.

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government